Illinois, session 104th, HB2450.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The America's Central Port District Act is 5amended by changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 1860/6)  (from Ch. 19, par. 289)7    Sec. 6. The The District has power to apply for and accept 8grants, loans, or appropriations from the federal government, 9the State of Illinois, Madison or Jersey Counties, or any 10agency or instrumentality thereof to be used for any of the 11purposes of the District and to enter into any agreements with 12the federal, State, and county governments in relation to such 13grants, loans or appropriations.14    The District may petition any federal, state, municipal, 15or local authority, administrative, judicial and legislative, 16having jurisdiction in the premises, for the adoption and 17execution of any physical improvement, change in method or 18system of handling freight, warehousing, docking, lightering, 19and transfer of freight, which in the opinion of the District 20is designed to improve or better the handling of commerce in 21and through the Port District or improve terminal or 22transportation facilities therein.23(Source: P.A. 98-854, eff. 1-1-15.)